North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-23 Institutions Under Control of Director of Institutions [Repealed]

[Each section of this chapter has been repealed or omitted as not of a general or
permanent nature. The repeals may be found at S.L. 1957, ch. 196, § 22;
S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 117; S.L. 1965, ch. 181, § 33; S.L. 1965, ch. 203, § 86;
S.L. 1977, ch. 420, § 3; S.L. 1979, ch. 568, § 11; S.L. 1989, ch. 156, § 54;
S.L. 1991, ch. 592, § 47; S.L. 1991, ch. 595, § 3]